Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 7. Traffic Signs, Signals and Markings.

§ 63-3-301.
Adoption of uniform system of traffic-control devices.

The commissioner of public safety shall adopt a manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic-control devices consistent with the provisions of this chapter for use upon highways within this state. Such uniform system shall correlate with and so far as possible conform to the system then current as approved by the American Association of State Highway Officials.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8153; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-303.
Placing and maintaining of traffic-control devices upon state and county highways; placement of devices upon such highways by local authorities.

The commissioner of public safety and the state highway commission shall place and maintain such traffic-control devices conforming to its manual and specifications, upon all state and county highways as it shall deem necessary to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this chapter or to regulate, warn, or guide traffic.

No local authority shall place or maintain any traffic-control device upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the commissioner of public safety and the state highway commission except by the latter’s permission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8154; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-305.
Placing and maintaining of traffic-control devices upon highways under local jurisdiction.

Local authorities in their respective jurisdictions shall place and maintain such traffic control devices upon highways under their jurisdiction as they may deem necessary to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this chapter or provisions of local traffic ordinances or to regulate, warn, or guide traffic. All such traffic-control devices hereafter erected shall conform to the state manual and specifications.

Local authorities in exercising those functions referred to in the preceding paragraph shall be subject to the direction and control of the state highway commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8155; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-307.
Reflectors on bridges in state highway system.

The state highway commission is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to place amber reflectors on each end and on both sides of all bridges on all roads on the state highway system, which will permit a person to see such reflectors so that he might know that he is about to approach a bridge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8154; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-309.
Traffic-control signal colors and rules.

Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting the words “Go,” “Caution,” or “Stop,” or exhibiting different colored lights successively one (1) at a time, only the following colors shall be used and said terms and lights shall indicate as follows:

Green alone or “Go.”

Vehicular traffic facing the signal may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign at such place prohibits either such turn. However, vehicular traffic shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection at the time such signal is exhibited.

Pedestrians facing the signal may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk.

Yellow alone or “Caution” when shown following the green or “Go” signal.

Vehicular traffic facing the signal shall stop before entering the nearest crosswalk at the intersection, but if such stop cannot be made in safety a vehicle may be driven cautiously through the intersection.

Pedestrians facing such signal are thereby advised that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway, and any pedestrian then starting to cross shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles.

Red alone or “Stop.”

Vehicular traffic facing the signal shall stop before entering the nearest crosswalk at an intersection or at such other point as may be indicated by a clearly visible line and shall remain standing until green or “Go” is shown alone, except as provided in (b) and (c) of this paragraph (3);

Vehicular traffic facing a steady red signal may cautiously enter the intersection to turn right after stopping as required by paragraph (3)(a), unless a sign stating “No Turn On Red” is in place prohibiting such a turn. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other vehicular traffic lawfully using the intersection.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady red signal at the intersection of two (2) one-way streets may cautiously enter the intersection to turn left in the direction designated for one-way traffic, after stopping as required by paragraph (3)(a), unless a sign stating “No Turn On Red” is in place prohibiting such a turn. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians within an adjacent crosswalk and to other vehicular traffic lawfully using the intersection.

No pedestrian facing such signal shall enter the roadway unless he can do so safely and without interfering with any vehicular traffic.

Red with green arrow.

Vehicular traffic facing such signal may cautiously enter the intersection only to make movement indicated by such arrow but shall not interfere with other traffic or endanger pedestrians lawfully within a crosswalk.

No pedestrian facing such signal shall enter the roadway unless he can do so safely and without interfering with any vehicular traffic.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8157; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1974, ch. 399; Laws, 1976, ch. 308; Laws, 1987, ch. 412, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 63-3-311.
Flashing signal colors and rules.

Whenever flashing red or yellow signals are used they shall require obedience by vehicular traffic as follows:

1. Flashing red (stop signal).— When a red lens is illuminated by rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles shall stop before entering the nearest crosswalk at an intersection or at a limit line when marked and the right to proceed shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

2. Flashing yellow (caution signal).— When a yellow lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles may proceed through the intersection or past such signal only with caution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8158; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-313.
Disobedience of official traffic-control devices.

No driver of a vehicle shall disobey the instructions of any official traffic-control device placed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, unless at the time otherwise directed by a police officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8156; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-315.
Obedience of official traffic-control devices by emergency vehicles.

The driver of any authorized emergency vehicle when responding to an emergency call upon approaching a red or stop signal or any stop sign shall slow down as necessary for safety but may proceed cautiously past such red or stop sign or signal. At other times drivers of authorized emergency vehicles shall stop in obedience to a stop sign or signal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8148; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-317.
Unauthorized signs, signals, markings and devices.

No person shall place, maintain, or display upon or in view of any highway any unauthorized sign, signal, marking or device which purports to be or is an imitation of or resembles an official traffic-control device or railroad sign or signal, or which attempts to direct the movement of traffic, or which hides from view or interferes with the effectiveness of any official traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal. No person shall place or maintain and no public authority shall permit upon any highway any traffic sign or signal bearing thereon any commercial advertising, or any billboard or advertising sign of any kind or description, except that motorist services business signs and supports which are authorized by the state highway commission pursuant to Section 65-1-8 may be placed and maintained within state highway rights-of-way. This shall not be deemed to prohibit the erection upon private property adjacent to highways of signs giving useful directional information and of a type that cannot be mistaken for official signs provided that said signs are not erected closer than fifty (50) feet to the center line of state highways.

Every such prohibited sign, signal or marking is hereby declared to be a public nuisance and the authority having jurisdiction over the highway is hereby empowered to remove the same or cause it to be removed after ten (10) days’ notice to the owner thereof by registered letter or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8159; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1983, ch. 395, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-3-319.
Interference with official traffic-control devices or railroad signs or signals.

No person shall without lawful authority attempt to or in fact alter, deface, injure, knock down, or remove any official traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal, or any inscription, shield, or insignia thereon, or any other part thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8160; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-321.
Destruction, removal, etc., of detour sign, warning sign, barricade, or fence; offenses.

Any person who wilfully destroys, knocks down, removes, defaces, or alters any letters or figures on a detour or warning sign set upon a highway or road of this state, or who wilfully knocks down, removes, rearranges, destroys, defaces, or alters any letter or figures on a barricade or fence erected on any highway or road of this state, or who drives around or through any barricade or fence on any officially closed highway or road of this state, or who drives around such detour sign or barricade or fence, or who wilfully ignores or disregards a warning sign before such road has been officially opened to the public traffic by the Mississippi State Highway Department, or in appropriate cases by the county or municipal officer responsible for constructing or maintaining such roads, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. This shall have no application to peace officers in the performance of their duties, nor to employees of the Mississippi State Highway Department, nor to employees of the contractor, nor to employees of the federal authorities when engaged in inspection of surveys, repairs, maintenance, or construction on or alongside such highways, within the right-of-way, nor to individuals domiciled or making their livelihood within the affected areas, nor to any person or group of persons who shall be authorized by the highway director, or appropriate county or municipal officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8160.6; Laws, 1972, ch. 397, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1972).

§ 63-3-323.
Destruction, removal, etc., of detour sign, warning sign, barricade, or fence; definitions.

The following words, terms and phrases, when used in Section 63-3-321 shall have the meaning ascribed to them herein:

“Detour sign” means any sign placed across or on a public road of the state, by the state, the county or municipal authorities or by their contractors, indicating that such road is closed or partially closed, which sign also indicates the direction of an alternate route to be followed to give access to certain points.

“Warning sign” means a sign indicating construction work in area.

“Barricade” means a barrier for obstructing the passage of motor vehicle traffic.

“Fence” means a barrier to prevent the intrusion of motor vehicle traffic.

“Officially closed” means a highway or road that has been officially closed by a governmental unit, the Mississippi State Highway Department, a city or a county.

“Officially opened” shall mean any highway that does not have signs or barriers stating that it is closed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8160:5: Laws, 1972, ch. 397, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1972).

§ 63-3-325.
Destruction, removal, etc., of detour sign, warning sign, barricade, or fence; penalties.

Every person convicted of a violation of Section 63-3-321 shall be punished by a fine of not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. The conviction of a violation of Section 63-3-321 shall not be competent evidence in any civil action.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8160.7: Laws, 1972, ch. 397, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1972).